tools/spellcheckers/test/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpNP-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  CmpNP/Suff tests:
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom         : ~lohka  # +CmpNP/Suff converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Acc         : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen         : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen+Allegro : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@

    lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc             :  lohka
    lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen             :  lohka
    lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Allegro     :  lohka

    lohkat+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg            :   loga
    lohkat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2               :   loga
    lohkat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg          :   loga
    lohkat+V+TV+VGen                    :  ~loga  # VGen removed from fst, not likely for this class of verbs(?)

    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom         : [viesso#lohka]             # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom         : [vieso#lohka, viesu#lohka] # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom         : [viesuid#lohka]            # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Acc         : [viesso#loga]              # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Acc         : [vieso#loga, viesu#loga]   # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Acc         : [viesuid#loga]             # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen         : [viesso#loga]              # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen         : [vieso#loga, viesu#loga]   # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen         : [viesuid#loga]             # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen+Allegro : [viesso#loga]              # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen+Allegro : [vieso#loga, viesu#loga]   # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen+Allegro : [viesuid#loga]             # +CmpNP/Suff

    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc        : [viesso#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc        : [vieso#lohka, viesu#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc        : [viesuid#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen        : [viesso#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen        : [vieso#lohka, viesu#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen        : [viesuid#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Allegro: [viesso#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Allegro: [vieso#lohka, viesu#lohka]
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Allegro: [viesuid#lohka]
    
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#viessu+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom : ~lohka#viessu # +CmpNP/Last
    lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#viessu+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom : ~loga#viessu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gáica+N+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: ~viesso#lohka#gáica # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gáica+N+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: viesso#gáica # Just a check

  CmpNP/Last tests:
    lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: lávda       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    guolgaduhkku+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: guolga#duhkku       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [viesso#lávda] # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [viesu#lávda, vieso#lávda] # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [viesuid#lávda] # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [stohpo#guolga#duhkku] # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [stobu#guolga#duhkku] # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [stobuid#guolga#duhkku] # +CmpNP/Last
    lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#viessu+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: ~lávda#viessu # +CmpNP/Last
    guolgaduhkku+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#stohpu+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: ~guolga#duhku#stohpu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lávda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gáica+N+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: ~viesso#lávda#gáica # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N++Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#vearrát+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~stohpo#guolga#duhkko#vearrát # +CmpNP/Last

  CmpNP/First tests:
    EU-direktiiva+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiiva       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    mástorándi+N+Sem/State+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde#EU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+Sem/State+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp-#EU-direktiiva+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    EU-direktiiva+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mástorándi+N+Sem/State+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiiva#mástorándi # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+Sem/State+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde#EU-direktiiva#gáica # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+Sem/State+Cmp/SplitR#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiiva#gáica # +CmpNP/First
    
    várá+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: várá       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    várá+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#biigá+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: várá#biigán # +CmpNP/First
    biigá+N+Sem/Hum+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#várá+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~biigá#várá # +CmpNP/First

  CmpNP/None tests:
    ráddi+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ráddi       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ráddi+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#seaidni+Sem/Buildpart+N+Sg+Ill: ~rádde#seaidnái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart+Cmp#ráddi+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Ill: ~seaidne#ráddái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart+Cmp#ráddi+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#gorut+N+Sg+Nom: ~seaidne#rádde#gorut # +CmpNP/None

    ovccičuođis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom: ovcci#čuođis       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ovccičuođis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Cmp#osttus+N+Pl+Nom: ~ovcci#čuođes#ostosat       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#ovccičuođis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Ill: ~osttus#ovcci#čuođis       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#ovccičuođis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Cmp#osolaš+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom: ~osttus#ovcci#čuođes#osolaš # +CmpNP/None

  CmpNP/Pref tests:
    cirggangeahči+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~cirggan#geaš, cirggan#geahči]  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis - CmpNP/Pref removed, instead handled by lexicon FirstComponent.
    cirggangeahči+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp: cirggan#geaš-
    cirggangeahči+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart+Sg+Ill: cirggan#geaš#seaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    cirggangeahči+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart+Sg+Ill: cirggan#geaš-seaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    seaidni+N+Sem/Buildpart+Cmp#cirggangeahči+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~seaidne#cirggan#geahči # +CmpNP/Pref

    portugála+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~portugála  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    portugála+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp: portugála-
    portugála+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#metálla+N+G3+Sem/Mat+Sg+Acc: portugála#metálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    portugála+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#metálla+N+G3+Sem/Mat+Sg+Acc: portugála-metálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    metálla+N+G3+Cmp#portugála+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: ~metálla#portugála # +CmpNP/Pref
